Washington statutes.
RCW 33.44.080

Depositor's interest upon conversion.

Upon the conversion of any association into a savings bank or commercial bank, every person who was a depositor of the association at the time of the conversion shall become and be deemed to be a depositor of the bank in a sum equal to the value of the deposit of the depositor as of the day on which the conversion was consummated.

[ 1982 c 3 s 76; 1927 c 177 s 2; 1917 c 154 s 2; RRS s 3755.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.